Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB740.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 17A OF KRS CHAPTER 304
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cost-sharing requirement" means a deductible, coinsurance, a copayment,
or any other out-of-pocket expense requirement;
(b) "Orthotic device" or "orthosis":
1. Means a custom fabricated or custom fitted device that:
a. Is designed, fabricated, modified, or fitted to correct, support, or
compensate for a neuromusculoskeletal disorder or acquired
condition for the purpose of:
i. Stabilizing, stretching, or immobilizing a body part;
ii. Improving alignment;
iii. Preventing deformities;
iv. Protecting against injury; or
v. Assisting with motion or function; and
b. Worn on the outside of the body to help with a structural or
functional problem; and
2. Does not include:
a. Fabric or elastic supports;
b. Corsets;
c. Arch supports;
d. Low-temperature plastic splints;
e. Trusses;
f. Elastic hoses;
g. Canes;
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
h. Crutches;
i. Soft cervical collars;
j. Dental appliances; or
k. Other similar devices that are carried in stock, and sold as over-
the-counter items, by a drug store, department store, corset shop,
or surgical supply facility; and
(c) "Prosthetic device" or "prothesis":
1. Means a custom designed, fabricated, fitted, modified, or fitted and
modified device to replace an absent external body part for purposes of
restoring physiological function or cosmesis or both; and
2. Does not include:
a. Artificial eyes or ears;
b. Dental appliances;
c. Cosmetic devices, including breasts, eyelashes, or wigs; or
d. Any other device that does not have a significant impact on
mobility or the musculoskeletal functions of the body.
(2) All health benefit plans shall provide coverage for prosthetic devices and orthotic
devices that are medically necessary for any of the following:
(a) Activities of daily living;
(b) Essential job-related activities;
(c) Personal hygiene-related activities, including but not limited to:
1. Showering;
2. Bathing; and
3. Toileting; or
(d) Physical activities, including but not limited to running, biking, swimming,
and strength training in order to maximize the covered person's whole body
health, including upper and lower limb function;
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
(3) The coverage required under this section:
(a) Shall include coverage for:
1. Three (3) prosthetic devices or orthotic devices per affected limb per
covered person during a three (3) year period;
2. All materials and components for the use of a prosthetic device or
orthotic device, including:
a. The prosthesis or orthosis;
b. Structural components, including the socket;
c. Suspension mechanisms, including the pin, lock, suction, and
elevated vacuum;
d. Hip joints, knee joints, feet, alignable parts, and terminal
devices;
e. Connective components, including pads, bands, and cushions;
and
f. Consumable items, including socks, sleeves, and liners;
3. Formulation of a prosthetic device's or orthotic device's design,
fabrication, measurements, and fittings;
4. Education and training on using and maintaining a prosthetic device
or orthotic device;
5. The repair of a prosthetic device or orthotic device and its
components;
6. The replacement of a prosthetic device or orthotic device and its
materials and components when the device to be replaced is less than
three (3) years old if there is adequate documentation of:
a. A change in physiological condition of the covered person;
b. An irreparable change in the condition of the device to be
replaced or any of its components; or
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
c. The device to be replaced or a component of the device to be
replaced requires repairs that would exceed sixty percent (60%)
of the cost of the device; and
7. The replacement of a socket if there is adequate documentation of:
a. A physiological need, including but not limited to a change in
the residual limb;
b. A functional need change;
c. Irreparable damage; or
d. Wear and tear due to:
i. Excessive weight of a covered person; or
ii. Physical demands of an active covered person; and
(b) Shall not be subject to any limitation or requirement with respect to out-of-
network coverage, including cost-sharing requirements, unless the
limitation or requirement is not more restrictive than the restrictions and
requirements applicable to out-of-network coverage for medical or surgical
benefits under the health benefit plan.
(3) (a) 1. By July 1, 2033, the commissioner shall submit a report to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Banking and Insurance regarding the implementation
of the coverage required under this section.
2. The report required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall
include but not be limited to the data provided under paragraph (b)1.
and 2. of this subsection.
(b) An insurer that offers or provides a health benefit plan shall provide the
commissioner with all data requested by the commissioner for the purpose
of completing the report required under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
including but not limited to the following for plans years 2027 to 2031:
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
1. The number of claims submitted for the coverage required under this
section; and
2. The number of claims submitted for the coverage required under this
section that were paid.
(4) The commissioner shall promulgate any administrative regulation in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A that is necessary to implement this section.
(5) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a health benefit plan from
providing coverage that is:
(a) Greater than the minimum coverage required under this section; or
(b) Generally more favorable to the covered person than the coverage required
under this section.
Section 2. KRS 164.2871 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of each state postsecondary educational institution is
authorized to purchase liability insurance for the protection of the individual
members of the governing board, faculty, and staff of such institutions from liability
for acts and omissions committed in the course and scope of the individual's
employment or service. Each institution may purchase the type and amount of
liability coverage deemed to best serve the interest of such institution.
(2) All retirement annuity allowances accrued or accruing to any employee of a state
postsecondary educational institution through a retirement program sponsored by
the state postsecondary educational institution are hereby exempt from any state,
county, or municipal tax, and shall not be subject to execution, attachment,
garnishment, or any other process whatsoever, nor shall any assignment thereof be
enforceable in any court. Except retirement benefits accrued or accruing to any
employee of a state postsecondary educational institution through a retirement
program sponsored by the state postsecondary educational institution on or after
January 1, 1998, shall be subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020, to the extent
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
provided in KRS 141.010 and 141.0215.
(3) Except as provided in KRS Chapter 44, the purchase of liability insurance for
members of governing boards, faculty and staff of institutions of higher education
in this state shall not be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity or any
other immunity or privilege.
(4) The governing board of each state postsecondary education institution is authorized
to provide a self-insured employer group health plan to its employees, which plan
shall:
(a) Conform to the requirements of Subtitle 32 of KRS Chapter 304; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, be exempt from
conformity with Subtitle 17A of KRS Chapter 304.
(5) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board of a
state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.17A-129;
(b) KRS 304.17A-133;
(c) KRS 304.17A-145;
(d) KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(e) KRS 304.17A-261;
(f) KRS 304.17A-262;
(g) KRS 304.17A-264;[ and]
(h) KRS 304.17A-265; and
(i) Section 1 of this Act.
(6) (a) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board of
a state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall provide a
special enrollment period to pregnant women who are eligible for coverage in
accordance with the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The governing board of a state postsecondary education institution shall, at or
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
before the time an employee is initially offered the opportunity to enroll in the
plan or coverage, provide the employee a notice of the special enrollment
rights under this subsection.
Section 3. KRS 18A.225 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The term "employee" for purposes of this section means:
1. Any person, including an elected public official, who is regularly
employed by any department, office, board, agency, or branch of state
government; or by a public postsecondary educational institution; or by
any city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government, whose legislative body has opted to participate in the state-
sponsored health insurance program pursuant to KRS 79.080; and who
is either a contributing member to any one (1) of the retirement systems
administered by the state, including but not limited to the Kentucky
Retirement Systems, County Employees Retirement System, Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System, the Legislators' Retirement Plan, or the
Judicial Retirement Plan; or is receiving a contractual contribution from
the state toward a retirement plan; or, in the case of a public
postsecondary education institution, is an individual participating in an
optional retirement plan authorized by KRS 161.567; or is eligible to
participate in a retirement plan established by an employer who ceases
participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System pursuant to
KRS 61.522 whose employees participated in the health insurance plans
administered by the Personnel Cabinet prior to the employer's effective
cessation date in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System;
2. Any certified or classified employee of a local board of education or a
public charter school as defined in KRS 160.1590;
3. Any elected member of a local board of education;
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
4. Any person who is a present or future recipient of a retirement
allowance from the Kentucky Retirement Systems, County Employees
Retirement System, Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, the
Legislators' Retirement Plan, the Judicial Retirement Plan, or the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System's optional
retirement plan authorized by KRS 161.567, except that a person who is
receiving a retirement allowance and who is age sixty-five (65) or older
shall not be included, with the exception of persons covered under KRS
61.702(2)(b)3. and 78.5536(2)(b)3., unless he or she is actively
employed pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph; and
5. Any eligible dependents and beneficiaries of participating employees
and retirees who are entitled to participate in the state-sponsored health
insurance program;
(b) The term "health benefit plan" for the purposes of this section means a health
benefit plan as defined in KRS 304.17A-005;
(c) The term "insurer" for the purposes of this section means an insurer as defined
in KRS 304.17A-005; and
(d) The term "managed care plan" for the purposes of this section means a
managed care plan as defined in KRS 304.17A-500.
(2) (a) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the
recommendation of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet, shall procure, in
compliance with the provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090,
from one (1) or more insurers authorized to do business in this state, a group
health benefit plan that may include but not be limited to health maintenance
organization (HMO), preferred provider organization (PPO), point of service
(POS), and exclusive provider organization (EPO) benefit plans
encompassing all or any class or classes of employees. With the exception of
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
employers governed by the provisions of KRS Chapters 16, 18A, and 151B,
all employers of any class of employees or former employees shall enter into
a contract with the Personnel Cabinet prior to including that group in the state
health insurance group. The contracts shall include but not be limited to
designating the entity responsible for filing any federal forms, adoption of
policies required for proper plan administration, acceptance of the contractual
provisions with health insurance carriers or third-party administrators, and
adoption of the payment and reimbursement methods necessary for efficient
administration of the health insurance program. Health insurance coverage
provided to state employees under this section shall, at a minimum, contain
the same benefits as provided under Kentucky Kare Standard as of January 1,
1994, and shall include a mail-order drug option as provided in subsection
(13) of this section. All employees and other persons for whom the health care
coverage is provided or made available shall annually be given an option to
elect health care coverage through a self-funded plan offered by the
Commonwealth or, if a self-funded plan is not available, from a list of
coverage options determined by the competitive bid process under the
provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090 and made available
during annual open enrollment.
(b) The policy or policies shall be approved by the commissioner of insurance
and may contain the provisions the commissioner of insurance approves,
whether or not otherwise permitted by the insurance laws.
(c) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to
provide coverage to all members of the state group, including active
employees and retirees and their eligible covered dependents and
beneficiaries, within the county or counties specified in its bid. Except as
provided in subsection (20) of this section, any carrier bidding to offer health
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
care coverage to employees shall also agree to rate all employees as a single
entity, except for those retirees whose former employers insure their active
employees outside the state-sponsored health insurance program and as
otherwise provided in KRS 61.702(2)(b)3.b. and 78.5536(2)(b)3.b.
(d) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to
provide enrollment, claims, and utilization data to the Commonwealth in a
format specified by the Personnel Cabinet with the understanding that the data
shall be owned by the Commonwealth; to provide data in an electronic form
and within a time frame specified by the Personnel Cabinet; and to be subject
to penalties for noncompliance with data reporting requirements as specified
by the Personnel Cabinet. The Personnel Cabinet shall take strict precautions
to protect the confidentiality of each individual employee; however,
confidentiality assertions shall not relieve a carrier from the requirement of
providing stipulated data to the Commonwealth.
(e) The Personnel Cabinet shall develop the necessary techniques and capabilities
for timely analysis of data received from carriers and, to the extent possible,
provide in the request-for-proposal specifics relating to data requirements,
electronic reporting, and penalties for noncompliance. The Commonwealth
shall own the enrollment, claims, and utilization data provided by each carrier
and shall develop methods to protect the confidentiality of the individual. The
Personnel Cabinet shall include in the October annual report submitted
pursuant to the provisions of KRS 18A.226 to the Governor, the General
Assembly, and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, an analysis of the
financial stability of the program, which shall include but not be limited to
loss ratios, methods of risk adjustment, measurements of carrier quality of
service, prescription coverage and cost management, and statutorily required
mandates. If state self-insurance was available as a carrier option, the report
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
also shall provide a detailed financial analysis of the self-insurance fund
including but not limited to loss ratios, reserves, and reinsurance agreements.
(f) If any agency participating in the state-sponsored employee health insurance
program for its active employees terminates participation and there is a state
appropriation for the employer's contribution for active employees' health
insurance coverage, then neither the agency nor the employees shall receive
the state-funded contribution after termination from the state-sponsored
employee health insurance program.
(g) Any funds in flexible spending accounts that remain after all reimbursements
have been processed shall be transferred to the credit of the state-sponsored
health insurance plan's appropriation account.
(h) Each entity participating in the state-sponsored health insurance program shall
provide an amount at least equal to the state contribution rate for the employer
portion of the health insurance premium. For any participating entity that used
the state payroll system, the employer contribution amount shall be equal to
but not greater than the state contribution rate.
(3) The premiums may be paid by the policyholder:
(a) Wholly from funds contributed by the employee, by payroll deduction or
otherwise;
(b) Wholly from funds contributed by any department, board, agency, public
postsecondary education institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county,
charter county, county, or consolidated local government; or
(c) Partly from each, except that any premium due for health care coverage or
dental coverage, if any, in excess of the premium amount contributed by any
department, board, agency, postsecondary education institution, or branch of
state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government for any other health care coverage shall be paid by the employee.
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
(4) If an employee moves his or her place of residence or employment out of the
service area of an insurer offering a managed health care plan, under which he or
she has elected coverage, into either the service area of another managed health care
plan or into an area of the Commonwealth not within a managed health care plan
service area, the employee shall be given an option, at the time of the move or
transfer, to change his or her coverage to another health benefit plan.
(5) No payment of premium by any department, board, agency, public postsecondary
educational institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county,
county, or consolidated local government shall constitute compensation to an
insured employee for the purposes of any statute fixing or limiting the
compensation of such an employee. Any premium or other expense incurred by any
department, board, agency, public postsecondary educational institution, or branch
of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government shall be considered a proper cost of administration.
(6) The policy or policies may contain the provisions with respect to the class or classes
of employees covered, amounts of insurance or coverage for designated classes or
groups of employees, policy options, terms of eligibility, and continuation of
insurance or coverage after retirement.
(7) Group rates under this section shall be made available to the disabled child of an
employee regardless of the child's age if the entire premium for the disabled child's
coverage is paid by the state employee. A child shall be considered disabled if he or
she has been determined to be eligible for federal Social Security disability benefits.
(8) The health care contract or contracts for employees shall be entered into for a
period of not less than one (1) year.
(9) The secretary shall appoint thirty-two (32) persons to an Advisory Committee of
State Health Insurance Subscribers to advise the secretary or the secretary's
designee regarding the state-sponsored health insurance program for employees.
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
The secretary shall appoint, from a list of names submitted by appointing
authorities, members representing school districts from each of the seven (7)
Supreme Court districts, members representing state government from each of the
seven (7) Supreme Court districts, two (2) members representing retirees under age
sixty-five (65), one (1) member representing local health departments, two (2)
members representing the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, and three (3)
members at large. The secretary shall also appoint two (2) members from a list of
five (5) names submitted by the Kentucky Education Association, two (2) members
from a list of five (5) names submitted by the largest state employee organization of
nonschool state employees, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted
by the Kentucky Association of Counties, two (2) members from a list of five (5)
names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities, and two (2) members from a
list of names consisting of five (5) names submitted by each state employee
organization that has two thousand (2,000) or more members on state payroll
deduction. The advisory committee shall be appointed in January of each year and
shall meet quarterly.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the policy or policies
provided to employees pursuant to this section shall not provide coverage for
obtaining or performing an abortion, nor shall any state funds be used for the
purpose of obtaining or performing an abortion on behalf of employees or their
dependents.
(11) Interruption of an established treatment regime with maintenance drugs shall be
grounds for an insured to appeal a formulary change through the established appeal
procedures approved by the Department of Insurance, if the physician supervising
the treatment certifies that the change is not in the best interests of the patient.
(12) Any employee who is eligible for and elects to participate in the state health
insurance program as a retiree, or the spouse or beneficiary of a retiree, under any
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
one (1) of the state-sponsored retirement systems shall not be eligible to receive the
state health insurance contribution toward health care coverage as a result of any
other employment for which there is a public employer contribution. This does not
preclude a retiree and an active employee spouse from using both contributions to
the extent needed for purchase of one (1) state sponsored health insurance policy
for that plan year.
(13) (a) The policies of health insurance coverage procured under subsection (2) of
this section shall include a mail-order drug option for maintenance drugs for
state employees. Maintenance drugs may be dispensed by mail order in
accordance with Kentucky law.
(b) A health insurer shall not discriminate against any retail pharmacy located
within the geographic coverage area of the health benefit plan and that meets
the terms and conditions for participation established by the insurer, including
price, dispensing fee, and copay requirements of a mail-order option. The
retail pharmacy shall not be required to dispense by mail.
(c) The mail-order option shall not permit the dispensing of a controlled
substance classified in Schedule II.
(14) The policy or policies provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to
this section shall provide coverage for obtaining a hearing aid and acquiring hearing
aid-related services for insured individuals under eighteen (18) years of age, subject
to a cap of one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) every thirty-six (36) months
pursuant to KRS 304.17A-132.
(15) Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section
shall provide coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of autism spectrum disorders
consistent with KRS 304.17A-142.
(16) Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section
shall provide coverage for obtaining amino acid-based elemental formula pursuant
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
to KRS 304.17A-258.
(17) If a state employee's residence and place of employment are in the same county,
and if the hospital located within that county does not offer surgical services,
intensive care services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic
cardiac catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the
employee may select a plan available in a contiguous county that does provide
those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the amount available
in the county where the plan selected is located.
(18) If a state employee's residence and place of employment are each located in
counties in which the hospitals do not offer surgical services, intensive care
services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic cardiac
catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the employee
may select a plan available in a county contiguous to the county of residence that
does provide those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the
amount available in the county where the plan selected is located.
(19) The Personnel Cabinet is encouraged to study whether it is fair and reasonable and
in the best interests of the state group to allow any carrier bidding to offer health
care coverage under this section to submit bids that may vary county by county or
by larger geographic areas.
(20) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the bid for proposals for health
insurance coverage for calendar year 2004 shall include a bid scenario that reflects
the statewide rating structure provided in calendar year 2003 and a bid scenario that
allows for a regional rating structure that allows carriers to submit bids that may
vary by region for a given product offering as described in this subsection:
(a) The regional rating bid scenario shall not include a request for bid on a
statewide option;
(b) The Personnel Cabinet shall divide the state into geographical regions which
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
shall be the same as the partnership regions designated by the Department for
Medicaid Services for purposes of the Kentucky Health Care Partnership
Program established pursuant to 907 KAR 1:705;
(c) The request for proposal shall require a carrier's bid to include every county
within the region or regions for which the bid is submitted and include but not
be restricted to a preferred provider organization (PPO) option;
(d) If the Personnel Cabinet accepts a carrier's bid, the cabinet shall award the
carrier all of the counties included in its bid within the region. If the Personnel
Cabinet deems the bids submitted in accordance with this subsection to be in
the best interests of state employees in a region, the cabinet may award the
contract for that region to no more than two (2) carriers; and
(e) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Personnel Cabinet from including
other requirements or criteria in the request for proposal.
(21) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed on or
after July 12, 2006, to public employees pursuant to this section which provides
coverage for services rendered by a physician or osteopath duly licensed under KRS
Chapter 311 that are within the scope of practice of an optometrist duly licensed
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 320 shall provide the same payment of
coverage to optometrists as allowed for those services rendered by physicians or
osteopaths.
(22) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to
public employees pursuant to this section shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.12-237;
(b) KRS 304.17A-270 and 304.17A-525;
(c) KRS 304.17A-600 to 304.17A-633;
(d) KRS 205.593;
(e) KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730;
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1862
(f) KRS 304.14-135;
(g) KRS 304.17A-580 and 304.17A-641;
(h) KRS 304.99-123;
(i) KRS 304.17A-138;
(j) KRS 304.17A-148;
(k) KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(l) KRS 304.17A-265;
(m) KRS 304.17A-261;
(n) KRS 304.17A-262;
(o) KRS 304.17A-145;
(p) KRS 304.17A-129;
(q) KRS 304.17A-133;
(r) KRS 304.17A-264;[ and]
(s) Section 1 of this Act; and
(t) Administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to statutes listed in this
subsection.
(23) (a) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to
public employees pursuant to this section shall provide a special enrollment
period to pregnant women who are eligible for coverage in accordance with
the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The Department of Employee Insurance shall, at or before the time a public
employee is initially offered the opportunity to enroll in the plan or coverage,
provide the employee a notice of the special enrollment rights under this
subsection.
Section 4. This Act applies to health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after
January 1, 2027.
Section 5. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed